Hawaii, session 2026, SB3122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that nutrition, diet, and exercise are key components in chronic disease prevention.  Prioritizing preventative health and physical activity promote healthier living outcomes and reduce costs of care and incidence of preventable hospitalization. The legislature also finds that students are leading increasingly sedentary lifestyles due to greater screen time and shifts toward indoor, virtual leisure activities.  Schools provide an important opportunity for students to become physically active throughout the day.  Physical activity supports students' academic and behavioral success, promotes healthy habits, and enhances socialization and critical thinking skills that extend beyond the school environment. The legislature further finds that the reinstatement of the presidential fitness test as the main assessment tool for the presidential fitness award, will provide a strong foundation for developing physical activity and will incentivize healthy competition.  Reinforcing physical and mental wellbeing in schools will help build healthier, more resilient communities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the board of education to amend the statewide performance standards for physical education to reinstate the presidential fitness test. SECTION 2. Section 302A-201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-201  Statewide performance standards.  (a)  The board shall establish statewide performance standards and the means to assess the standards based upon the recommendations in the final report of the performance standards commission established pursuant to Act 334, Session Laws of Hawaii 1991; provided that the board may review and modify the performance standards, as the board deems necessary, to reflect the needs of public school students and educational goals adopted by the board. (b) The board shall update standards within the Hawaii content and performance standards III for physical education K-12 to fully reinstate the presidential fitness test and comply with any reporting or other requirements imposed by the guidance associated with federal executive order 14327 of July 31, 2025. (c) The board shall implement the updated standards no later than the 2028-2029 school year." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST